Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 3. HEALTH PROFESSIONS

SUBTITLE J. PHARMACY AND PHARMACISTS

CHAPTER 568. PHARMACY TECHNICIANS AND PHARMACY TECHNICIAN TRAINEES

Sec. 568.001. RULES; QUALIFICATIONS. (a) In establishing rules under Section 554.053(c), the board shall require that:

(1) a pharmacy technician:

(A) have a high school diploma or a high school equivalency certificate or be working to achieve an equivalent diploma or certificate; and

(B) have passed a board-approved pharmacy technician certification examination; and

(2) a pharmacy technician trainee have a high school diploma or a high school equivalency certificate or be working to achieve an equivalent diploma or certificate.

(b) The board shall adopt rules that permit a pharmacy technician and pharmacy technician trainee to perform only nonjudgmental technical duties under the direct supervision of a pharmacist.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.313(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 583 (S.B. 869), Sec. 19, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 568.002. REGISTRATION REQUIRED. (a) A person must register with the board before beginning work in a pharmacy in this state as a pharmacy technician or a pharmacy technician trainee.

(b) The board may allow a pharmacy technician to petition the board for a special exemption from the pharmacy technician certification requirement if the pharmacy technician is in a county with a population of less than 50,000.

(c) An applicant for registration as a pharmacy technician or a pharmacy technician trainee must submit an application on a form prescribed by the board.

(d) A person's registration as a pharmacy technician or pharmacy technician trainee remains in effect as long as the person meets the qualifications established by board rule.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.313(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 583 (S.B. 869), Sec. 20, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 485 (H.B. 2561), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 568.003. GROUNDS FOR DISCIPLINARY ACTION. (a) The board may take disciplinary action under Section 568.0035 against an applicant for or the holder of a current or expired pharmacy technician or pharmacy technician trainee registration if the board determines that the applicant or registrant has:

(1) violated this subtitle or a rule adopted under this subtitle;

(2) engaged in gross immorality, as that term is defined by the rules of the board;

(3) engaged in any fraud, deceit, or misrepresentation, as those terms are defined by the rules of the board, in seeking a registration to act as a pharmacy technician or pharmacy technician trainee;

(4) been convicted of or placed on deferred adjudication community supervision or deferred disposition or the applicable federal equivalent for:

(A) a misdemeanor:

(i) involving moral turpitude; or

(ii) under Chapter 481 or 483, Health and Safety Code, or the Comprehensive Drug Abuse Prevention and Control Act of 1970 (21 U.S.C. Section 801 et seq.); or

(B) a felony;

(5) developed an incapacity that prevents the applicant or registrant from practicing as a pharmacy technician or pharmacy technician trainee with reasonable skill, competence, and safety to the public;

(6) violated:

(A) Chapter 481 or 483, Health and Safety Code, or rules relating to those chapters;

(B) Sections 485.031-485.034, Health and Safety Code; or

(C) a rule adopted under Section 485.002, Health and Safety Code;

(7) violated the pharmacy or drug laws or rules of this state, another state, or the United States;

(8) performed duties in a pharmacy that only a pharmacist may perform, as defined by the rules of the board;

(9) used alcohol or drugs in an intemperate manner that, in the board's opinion, could endanger a patient's life;

(10) engaged in negligent, unreasonable, or inappropriate conduct when working in a pharmacy;

(11) violated a disciplinary order;

(12) been convicted or adjudicated of a criminal offense that requires registration as a sex offender under Chapter 62, Code of Criminal Procedure; or

(13) been disciplined by a pharmacy or other health regulatory board of this state or another state for conduct substantially equivalent to conduct described by this subsection.

(b) A certified copy of the record of a state taking action described by Subsection (a)(13) is conclusive evidence of the action taken by the state.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.313(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1345 (S.B. 410), Sec. 33, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 837 (S.B. 1853), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 583 (S.B. 869), Sec. 21, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 16.002, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 568.0035. DISCIPLINE AUTHORIZED; EFFECT ON TRAINEE. (a) On a determination that a ground for discipline exists under Section 568.003, the board may:

(1) suspend the person's registration;

(2) revoke the person's registration;

(3) restrict the person's registration to prohibit the person from performing certain acts or from practicing as a pharmacy technician or pharmacy technician trainee in a particular manner for a term and under conditions determined by the board;

(4) impose an administrative penalty under Chapter 566;

(5) refuse to issue or renew the person's registration;

(6) place the offender's registration on probation and supervision by the board for a period determined by the board and impose a requirement that the registrant:

(A) report regularly to the board on matters that are the basis of the probation;

(B) limit practice to the areas prescribed by the board;

(C) continue or review professional education until the registrant attains a degree of skill satisfactory to the board in each area that is the basis of the probation; or

(D) pay the board a probation fee to defray the costs of monitoring the registrant during the period of probation;

(7) reprimand the person;

(8) retire the person's registration as provided by board rule; or

(9) impose more than one of the sanctions listed in this section.

(b) A disciplinary action affecting the registration of a pharmacy technician trainee remains in effect if the trainee obtains registration as a pharmacy technician.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1345 (S.B. 410), Sec. 34, eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 837 (S.B. 1853), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 583 (S.B. 869), Sec. 22, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 568.0036. SUBMISSION TO MENTAL OR PHYSICAL EXAMINATION. (a) This section applies to a pharmacy technician, pharmacy technician applicant, pharmacy technician trainee, or pharmacy technician trainee applicant.

(b) In enforcing Section 568.003(a)(5) or (7), the board or an authorized agent of the board on probable cause, as determined by the board or agent, may request a person subject to this section to submit to a mental or physical examination by a physician or other health care professional designated by the board.

(c) If the person refuses to submit to the examination, the board or the executive director of the board shall:

(1) issue an order requiring the person to show cause why the person will not submit to the examination; and

(2) schedule a hearing before a panel of three members of the board appointed by the president of the board on the order not later than the 30th day after the date notice of the order is served on the person under Subsection (d).

(d) The person shall be notified by either personal service or certified mail, return receipt requested.

(e) At the hearing, the person and the person's counsel may present testimony or other evidence to show why the person should not be required to submit to the examination. The person has the burden of proof to show why the person should not be required to submit to the examination.

(f) After the hearing, as applicable, the panel shall, by order:

(1) require the person to submit to the examination not later than the 60th day after the date of the order; or

(2) withdraw the request for examination.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 837 (S.B. 1853), Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 923 (S.B. 1438), Sec. 9, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 568.0037. TEMPORARY SUSPENSION OR RESTRICTION OF REGISTRATION. (a) The president of the board shall appoint a disciplinary panel consisting of three board members to determine whether a registration under this chapter should be temporarily suspended or restricted. If a majority of the panel determines from evidence or information presented to the panel that the registrant by continuation in practice as a pharmacy technician or pharmacy technician trainee would constitute a continuing threat to the public welfare, the panel shall temporarily suspend or restrict the registration as provided by Subsection (b).

(b) A disciplinary panel may temporarily suspend or restrict the registration:

(1) after a hearing conducted by the panel after the 10th day after the date notice of the hearing is provided to the registrant; or

(2) without notice or hearing if, at the time the suspension or restriction is ordered, a hearing before the panel is scheduled to be held not later than the 14th day after the date of the temporary suspension or restriction to determine whether the suspension or restriction should be continued.

(c) Not later than the 90th day after the date of the temporary suspension or restriction, the board shall initiate a disciplinary action under this chapter, and a contested case hearing shall be held by the State Office of Administrative Hearings. If the State Office of Administrative Hearings does not hold the hearing in the time required by this subsection, the suspended or restricted registration is automatically reinstated.

(d) Notwithstanding Chapter 551, Government Code, the disciplinary panel may hold a meeting by telephone conference call if immediate action is required and convening the panel at one location is inconvenient for any member of the disciplinary panel.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 923 (S.B. 1438), Sec. 10, eff. June 17, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 583 (S.B. 869), Sec. 23, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 568.004. RENEWAL OF REGISTRATION. (a) The board may adopt a system in which the registrations of pharmacy technicians and pharmacy technician trainees expire on various dates during the year.

(b) To renew a pharmacy technician registration, the registrant must, before the expiration date of the registration:

(1) pay a renewal fee as determined by the board under Section 568.005; and

(2) comply with the continuing education requirements prescribed by the board in accordance with Section 568.0045.

(c) A person whose pharmacy technician registration has been expired for 90 days or less may renew the expired registration by paying to the board a renewal fee that is equal to one and one-half times the normally required renewal fee for the registration.

(d) A person whose pharmacy technician registration has been expired for more than 90 days but less than one year may renew the expired registration by paying to the board a renewal fee that is equal to two times the normally required renewal fee for the registration.

(e) A person whose pharmacy technician registration has been expired for one year or more may not renew the registration. The person may register by complying with the requirements and procedures for initially registering, including the examination requirement.

(f) The board may refuse to renew a pharmacy technician registration for a registrant who is in violation of a board order.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.313(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 583 (S.B. 869), Sec. 24, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 485 (H.B. 2561), Sec. 19, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 568.0045. RULES RELATING TO CONTINUING EDUCATION. The board shall adopt rules relating to the continuing education required for pharmacy technicians. The rules must include requirements for:

(1) the number of hours of continuing education;

(2) the methods for meeting the continuing education requirements;

(3) the approval of continuing education programs;

(4) reporting completion of continuing education;

(5) records of completion of continuing education; and

(6) board audits to ensure compliance with the continuing education requirements.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 485 (H.B. 2561), Sec. 20, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 568.005. FEES. The board may adopt fees as necessary for the registration of pharmacy technicians and pharmacy technician trainees.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.313(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 583 (S.B. 869), Sec. 25, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 568.006. RATIO OF PHARMACISTS TO PHARMACY TECHNICIANS AND PHARMACY TECHNICIAN TRAINEES. The ratio of pharmacists to pharmacy technicians and pharmacy technician trainees in a Class A pharmacy must be at least one pharmacist for every five pharmacy technicians or pharmacy technician trainees if the Class A pharmacy dispenses not more than 20 different prescription drugs and does not produce intravenous or intramuscular drugs on-site.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1198, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 583 (S.B. 869), Sec. 26, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 568.008. PHARMACY TECHNICIANS IN HOSPITALS WITH CLINICAL PHARMACY PROGRAM. (a) In this section, "clinical pharmacy program" means a program that provides pharmaceutical care services as specified by board rule.

(b) A Class C pharmacy that has an ongoing clinical pharmacy program may allow a pharmacy technician to verify the accuracy of work performed by another pharmacy technician relating to the filling of floor stock and unit dose distribution systems for a patient admitted to the hospital if the patient's orders have previously been reviewed and approved by a pharmacist.

(c) The pharmacist-in-charge of the clinical pharmacy program shall adopt policies and procedures for the verification process authorized by this section.

(d) A hospital must notify the board before implementing the verification process authorized by this section.

(e) The board shall adopt rules to implement this section, including rules specifying:

(1) the duties that may be verified by another pharmacy technician;

(2) the records that must be maintained for the verification process; and

(3) the training requirements for pharmacy technicians who verify the accuracy of the work of other pharmacy technicians.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1128 (H.B. 1924), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 583 (S.B. 869), Sec. 27, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 568.009. CHANGE OF ADDRESS OR EMPLOYMENT. Not later than the 10th day after the date of a change of address or employment, a pharmacy technician or a pharmacy technician trainee shall notify the board in writing of the change.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 583 (S.B. 869), Sec. 28, eff. June 14, 2013.